Washington statutes.
RCW 10.99.060

Prosecutor's notice to victim—Description of available procedures.

The public attorney responsible for making the decision whether or not to prosecute shall advise the victim of that decision within five days, and, prior to making that decision shall advise the victim, upon the victim's request, of the status of the case. Notification to the victim that charges will not be filed shall include a description of the procedures available to the victim in that jurisdiction to initiate a criminal proceeding.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 105 s 6.]